Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 2. Specific Grants of Power

38-2-101.
Who may condemn real estate, rights-of-way, or other rights - additional requirements for private toll roads and toll highways.

If any corporation formed for the purpose of constructing a road, ditch, reservoir, pipeline, bridge, ferry, tunnel, telegraph line, railroad line, electric line, electric plant, telephone line, or telephone plant is unable to agree with the owner for the purchase of any real estate or right-of-way or easement or other right necessary or required for the purpose of any such corporation for transacting its business or for any lawful purpose connected with the operations of the company, the corporation may acquire title to such real estate or right-of-way or easement or other right in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of real estate or right-of-way. Any ditch, reservoir, or pipeline company, in the same manner, may condemn and acquire the right to take and use any water not previously appropriated.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a toll road or toll highway company may not condemn real estate or right-of-way, but the department of transportation may exercise, subject to the conditions and limitations set forth in sections 7-45-104 and 43-1-1202 (1)(f), C.R.S., the power of eminent domain for purposes of acquiring property and rights-of-way necessary for the completion of a toll road or toll highway open to the public that is incorporated into the comprehensive statewide transportation plan prepared pursuant to section 43-1-1103 (5), C.R.S., and is being undertaken as a public-private initiative between the department and the company. Such a toll road or toll highway company shall provide written notice of its intent to construct a toll road or toll highway as required by section 7-45-108 (2), C.R.S.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any toll road or toll highway company to construct a toll road or toll highway through, in, upon, under, or over any street or alley of any city, incorporated town, county, or city and county without first obtaining the consent of the municipal or county authorities having power to give the consent of the city, incorporated town, county, or city and county.

A political subdivision may levy a tax, fee, or charge on a toll road or toll highway company for any right or privilege of constructing or operating a toll road or toll highway such as a street or public highway construction permit fee or an impact fee or other similar development charge designed to fund expenditures by the political subdivision on capital facilities needed to serve the toll road or toll highway, but shall only levy a construction permit fee to the extent that the permit fee applies to all persons seeking a construction permit.

All permit fees, impact fees, or other similar development charges levied by a political subdivision on a toll road or toll highway company constructing or operating a toll road or toll highway shall be no greater than necessary to defray the costs directly incurred by the political subdivision in providing services, and, in the case of impact fees or other development charges, shall be no greater than necessary to defray impacts directly related to the toll road or toll highway. The fees and charges shall also be reasonably related in time to the incurrence of the impacts or costs. In any controversy concerning the appropriateness of a fee or charge, the political subdivision shall have the burden of proving that the fee or charge is no greater than necessary to defray the direct impacts or costs incurred by the political subdivision. All costs of construction shall be borne by the toll road or toll highway company constructing or operating the toll road or toll highway.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2008, p. 1712, § 9, effective June 2, 2008.)

“Toll road or toll highway” shall have the meaning set forth in section

7-45-102 (8)

, C.R.S.

“Toll road or toll highway company” shall have the meaning set forth in section

7-45-102 (9)

, C.R.S.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 304.

G.S.

§ 338.

L. 1891:

P. 98, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 2461.

C.L.

§ 6362.

CSA:

C. 61, § 52.

L. 52:

P. 109, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 50-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-2-1.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 1381, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2), (3), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 1769, § 2, effective June 6; entire section amended, p. 546, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(2) and (5)(a) amended, p. 1712, § 9, effective June 2.

38-2-102.
Entering lands to survey - liability.

Any corporation formed for the purpose of constructing a road, ditch, tunnel, or railroad may cause such examination and survey as may be necessary to the selection of the most advantageous route and, for such purpose, by its officers, agents, or servants may enter upon the lands of any person or corporation, but subject to liability for all actual damages which are occasioned thereby.

History.

Source: G.L.

§ 305.

G.S.

§ 339.

R.S. 08:

§ 2462.

C.L.

§ 6363.

CSA:

C. 61, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 50-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-2-2.

38-2-103.
Proceedings to drain.

Whenever the owners of any parcels of land desire to construct a drain for the purpose of carrying off surplus water and they cannot agree among themselves or with the parties who own land below, through which it is expedient to carry the drain in order to reach a natural waterway, then proceedings may be had in the same manner as in cases of eminent domain affecting irrigation works of diversion. The rights-of-way for such drains shall be regarded as equal to those for irrigation canals.

History.

Source: L. 1893:

P. 258, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2463.

C.L.

§ 6364.

CSA:

C. 61, § 54.

CRS 53:

§ 50-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-2-3.

38-2-104.
Mineral landowner may construct connecting railway spur.

It is lawful for the owner of any coal or other mineral lands, not contiguous to any railroad in this state, desiring to connect such lands with any railroad by means of a connecting railway spur, not to exceed fifteen miles in length, to construct and operate such connecting railway spur across any other lands lying intermediate between such coal or other mineral lands and any railroad with which such connection may be desired. In case the owner of such coal or other mineral lands is unable to agree with the owner of such intermediate lands for the purchase of any necessary rights-of-way across such intermediate lands for the purpose of constructing and operating such connecting railway spur as to the purchase price on such rights-of-way, then the owner of such coal or other mineral lands may exercise the right of eminent domain and condemn any rights-of-way across such intermediate lands necessary to make such connection and to construct and operate such connecting railway spur, and it may acquire title to such rights-of-way in the manner provided by law for the condemnation of lands for rights-of-way by railroad companies. All the laws of this state relating to the manner of exercising the right of eminent domain by railroad companies are hereby made applicable to such proceedings.

History.

Source:
L. 01:

P. 237, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 2464.

C.L.

§ 6365.

CSA:

C. 61, § 55.

CRS 53:

§ 50-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-2-4.

38-2-105.
Higher education governing boards have right of eminent domain.

The regents of the university of Colorado, the board of governors of the Colorado state university system for Colorado state university and Colorado state university - Pueblo, the board of trustees for Fort Lewis college, the board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines, the board of trustees for the university of northern Colorado, the board of trustees for Adams state university, the board of trustees for Colorado Mesa university, the board of trustees for Western Colorado university, and the board of trustees for Metropolitan state university of Denver have the power to acquire real property, which they may deem necessary, by the exercise of eminent domain through condemnation proceedings in accordance with law.

History.

Source:
L. 37:

P. 402, § 1.

CSA:

C. 61, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 50-2-5.

L. 61:

Pp. 708, 709, §§ 2, 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-2-5.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1249, § 27, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2002, § 65, effective May 22; entire section amended, p. 792, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1205, § 81, effective August 4.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended,(HB 10-1375), ch. 327, p. 1515, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended,(SB 11-265), ch. 292, p. 1368, § 26, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended,(HB 12-1080), ch. 189, p. 761, § 25, effective May 19; entire section amended,(SB 12-148), ch. 125, p. 429, § 20, effective July 1; entire section amended,(HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1272, § 20, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended,(HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3547, § 20, effective July 1.

Editor’s note:

(1) Amendments to this section by House Bill 03-1093 and House Bill 03-1344 were harmonized.

(2) Amendments to this section by House Bill 12-1080, House Bill 12-1331, and Senate Bill 12-148 were harmonized.